Vermont statutes. TITLE 3A Executive Orders
Chapter 20. Internal Security and Public Safety
WHEREAS, since December 2019, Vermont has been working in close collaboration with the national Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (“CDC”) and with the United States Health and Human Services Agency to monitor and plan for the potential for an
outbreak of respiratory illness due to a novel coronavirus (“COVID-19”), in the United States; and

WHEREAS, the Governor directed the Vermont Department of Health (“VDH”) to activate the Health Operations Center in February 2020 when VDH began to monitor and later, test Vermonters who may have been exposed to COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, in March 2020, the Governor directed the Department of Public Safety, Division of Vermont Emergency Management (“DPS/VEM”) to assemble an interagency taskforce, and later to activate the Vermont State Emergency Operations Center (“SEOC”), in
accordance with the State Emergency Management Plan, to organize prevention, response, and mitigation efforts and share information with local and state officials; and

WHEREAS, on March 7, 2020 and March 11, 2020, VDH detected the first two cases of COVID-19 in Vermont; and

WHEREAS, on March 11, 2020 the World Health Organization made the assessment that COVID-19 can be characterized as a pandemic; and

WHEREAS, on Friday, March 13, 2020, the Governor issued Executive Order 01-20, Declaration of State of Emergency in Response to COVID-19 and National Guard Call-Out (“Executive Order”), declaring a state of emergency for the State of Vermont in response
to COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, on Friday, March 13, 2020, President Trump issued a national emergency declaration for the COVID-19 pandemic; and

WHEREAS, the Governor, in consultation with VDH and the Vermont Agency of Human Services, has initiated aggressive and sustained efforts to protect property and public health, and to ensure public safety in this public health emergency including:

• Directive 1 issued March 15, 2020, to all School Boards and Superintendents for Continuity of Education Planning which closed all schools to in-person education and required planning for education continuity;

• Addendum 1 to the Executive Order issued March 16, 2020, which modified the Executive Order to prohibit all non-essential mass gatherings to the lesser of fifty (50) people or fifty percent (50%) of the occupancy of a facility at the same time for social,
recreational or entertainment activities;

• Addendum 2 to the Executive Order issued March 17, 2020 ordering restaurants, bars, or establishments that offer food or drink to suspend on-premises consumption of food or drink;

• Directive 2 issued March 17, 2020 to all School Boards, Superintendents, and Child Care Programs to close childcare centers and provide for services to children of Essential Persons during the closure period in response to COVID-19;

• Directive 3 issued March 18, 2020 directing Department of Motor Vehicle services to provide online, by mail or phone, and suspend all in-person transactions;

• Directive 4 issued March 19, 2020 to the Department of Liquor and Lottery authorizing take-out, curbside pickup and delivery of beverage alcohol, including spirit-based drinks and malt and vinous product accompanying food orders for off-premise consumption;

• Addendum 3 to the Executive Order issued March 20, 2020, requiring the postponement of all non-essential adult elective surgery and medical and surgical procedures;

• Addendum 4 to the Executive Order issued March 21, 2020, which suspended the operation of close-contact businesses and further restricted the size of mass gatherings;

• Addendum 5 to the Executive Order issued March 23, 2020, which ordered all businesses and non-profits to institute work from home procedures to the extent possible;

• Addendum 6 to the Executive Order issued March 24, 2020, which ordered all Vermonters to stay home, stay safe with the exception of those performing critical services (“Stay Home/Stay Safe”);

• Directive 5 issued March 25, 2020 clarifying schools for preK-12 students shall remain dismissed for in-person instruction for the remainder of the 2019-2020 school year and required schools to have continuity of learning plans for remote learning implemented
on or before Monday, April 13, 2020;

• Addendum 7 to the Executive Order issued March 30, 2020, which imposed quarantine restrictions on travelers arriving in Vermont and clarified the closure of lodging operations;

• Addendum 8 to the Executive Order issued April 3, 2020, which clarified the Governor’s direction to provide non-congregate sheltering in Vermont and extended certain deadlines relating to closures of DMV and bars and restaurants; and

• Addendum 9 to the Executive Order issued April 10, 2020, which extended the Executive order through May 15 and made other directives and clarifications.

WHEREAS, modeling studies done for the State clearly show that, but for the mitigation measures taken to date, the number of COVID-19 cases and COVID-19 related deaths in the State and the region would be having a much more devastating effect on Vermonters
and would be threatening to overwhelm the capacity of the Vermont health care system; and

WHEREAS, as of April 17, 2020, the Governor began to undertake a phased approach set forth below, to reopen the economy, addressing the need to restore and strengthen the State’s overall social and economic wellbeing while including measures for the prevention
of a resurgence of COVID-19 that would undermine or lose the important public health outcomes achieved to date:

• Phase 1 set forth in Addendum 10 to the Executive Order issued April 17, 2020, which outlined principles and safety precautions for a phased restart of the Vermont economy, allowed small crews for outside construction or other outdoor trade jobs, and
single-worker professional services and clarified guidance for retailers to allow additional operations using delivery and curbside service;

• Phase 2 set forth in Addendum 11 to the Executive Order issued April 24, 2020, which allowed an expansion of small crews for construction and resumption of manufacturing and distribution operations with small crews, in-person shopping at outdoor retail
operations and farmers markets and offered clarity for library operations;

• Phase 3 set forth in Addendum 12 to the Executive Order issued May 1. 2020, which required enhanced training for larger operations and mask use on public transit and in public transportation facilities, and allowed further phased expansion, up to full
operations, of construction, manufacturing and distribution operations;

• Phase 4 set forth in an Amendment to Addendum 3 to the Executive Order issued May 4, 2020, which allowed for the phased restart of elective medical and surgical procedures;

• Phase 5 set forth in Addendum 13 to the Executive Order issued May 6, 2020, which expanded some outdoor recreation and allowed limited social interactions; and

• Phase 6 set forth in an Amendment to Addendum 6 to the Executive Order (Stay Home/Stay Safe) issued May 13, 2020, which allowed for limited resumption of retail operations which were not deemed critical under Stay Home/Stay Safe; and

WHEREAS, the Governor has determined, in consultation with the Commissioner of VDH and DPS/VEM, based on the best science and data available, to extend the State of Emergency for the State of Vermont through Monday, June 15, 2020; and

WHEREAS, the Governor has further determined, in consultation with the Commissioner of VDH and DPS/VEM, based on the best science and data available, to further modify Addendum 6 to the Executive Order to expand the range of activities and travel Vermonters
may enjoy with an understanding that VDH and CDC health and safety measures should be followed; and

WHEREAS, the Governor has determined to authorize lodging facilities to resume operations on a limited basis beginning May 22, 2020, subject to further action as needed to respond to continued COVID-19 response.

NOW THEREFORE, I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor of Vermont by the Constitution of the State of Vermont, the emergency powers set forth in 20 V.S.A. §§ 8, 9 and 11 and other laws hereby declare the State of Emergency
for the State of Vermont shall be extended through midnight on Monday, June 15, 2020.

IT IS FURTHER ORDERED:

1.
Except as set forth herein, the Executive Order and all Directives and Addenda, as amended, issued thereunder shall continue in full force and effect until midnight on June 15, 2020, at which time the Governor,
in consultation with the Vermont Department of Health and the Department of Public Safety/Division of Emergency Management shall assess the emergency and determine whether to amend or extend the State of Emergency.

2.

Be Smart/Stay Safe:
Section 1 of Addendum 6 of the Executive Order (Stay Home/Stay Safe), is hereby amended and restated as follows:

To preserve the public health and safety, to ensure the healthcare delivery system is capable of serving all, and to help protect those at the highest risk and vulnerability, Vermonters are encouraged to limit their exposure to disease outside their homes
or places of residence as much as possible.

Vermonters should travel only as needed:

• For personal safety, medical care and care of others;

• For work, although all workers should continue to work remotely whenever possible;

• For shopping and services available at all businesses and non-profit and government entities determined to be critical and those which have been authorized to resume operations;

• To get fresh air and exercise by taking advantage of outdoor recreation and outdoor fitness activities that require low or no direct physical contact;

• For limited social interactions and gatherings of 10 or fewer, preferably in outdoor settings; and

• For in-state stays at available lodging, campground and marina facilities.

To keep disease from spreading, Vermonters should maintain physical distancing and protocols for hygiene recommended in guidance from CDC, VDH and other designated state agencies and departments. This means:

• Always staying home and away from others if you are sick with COVID-19, have recently been exposed to someone who has COVID-19, or just don’t feel well;

• Keeping a 6-foot distance from others when you meet people outside of your household;

• Frequently washing your hands (hand sanitizer is acceptable when soap and water are not available);

• Coughing and sneezing into your elbow (even if you are wearing a facial covering);

• Wearing a facial covering over your nose and mouth when you are in close proximity to others from outside your household; and

• Limiting travel to within Vermont to the extent possible and when you do travel, limit non-essential stops.

Older adults (age 65 and over), and people with underlying medical conditions, like heart and lung disease or diabetes, are more likely to develop severe illness. They should continue to shelter in place, and Vermonters should do everything they can to
help keep them safe.

3.

General Public Mask Use.
All Vermonters are encouraged to wear face coverings over their nose and mouth any time they are interacting with others from outside their households, including in congregate outdoor settings where it is not
possible to maintain physical distancing. Masks are not recommended for strenuous outdoor activity, anyone under the age of 2, anyone with a medical condition that is complicated or irritated by a facial covering, or anyone
with difficulty breathing. Masks are not required when eating in outdoor settings. Businesses and non-profit and government entities may require customers or clients to wear masks. The legislative body of each municipality
may enact more strict local requirements regarding mask use than those set forth herein.

4.

Lodging Operations.
Addendum 6 and Addendum 7 to the Executive Order are hereby modified to allow the limited resumption of lodging operations, including hotels, motels, bed and breakfasts, inns, short term rentals, such as those
made available through VRBO, Homeaway, AirBnb and other services, parks for recreational vehicles and campgrounds, all public and private camping facilities including those managed by the Vermont Department of Parks and Recreation,
and marinas.

Lodging may be provided for the following purposes:

a.
Housing vulnerable populations (emergency shelter for homeless individuals) as arranged through the state;

b.
Providing accommodations for health care workers, other workers deemed necessary to support public health, public safety or critical infrastructure and workers entering the state for authorized work;

c.
Use of lodging properties as quarantine facilities as arranged by the state; and

d.
Lodging for Vermont residents and others who certify self-quarantine for a minimum of 14 days prior to lodging overnight in Vermont.

On-line reservations may be resumed as of the date of this Addendum for stays beginning May 22, 2020. Lodging providers, and the online platforms that facilitate rentals and reservations, shall clearly post a prominent notice on their web platforms which
advises potential guests of the health and safety requirements currently applicable to lodging and gatherings in Vermont.

The Secretary of the Agency of Commerce and Community Development (ACCD) shall issue mitigation requirements and procedures which require implementation of appropriate occupancy limits for stays and events and physical distancing, health and sanitation
and training measures. The Secretary of ACCD, in consultation with the Commissioner of VDH, and with the approval of the Governor, may, from time-to-time, authorize additional limited, incremental, and phased resumption of
lodging operations and update and modify the mitigation requirements and procedures regarding the resumption of lodging operations.

If the Commissioner of the VDH has determined that a COVID-19 outbreak has occurred and lodging operations cannot safely operate in a way that 1) limits the exposure of customers and staff to COVID-19 and 2) does not threaten to overwhelm our hospitals
and healthcare resources, he is hereby authorized, with approval of the Governor, to notify and require any or all lodging operations to return to certain standards of operation.

5.
For the sake of clarity, Addendum 2 to the Executive Order dated March 16, 2020, which prohibited on-premises consumption of food or drink, Addendum 4 to the Executive Order dated March 20, 2020, which suspended
the operation of close contact businesses, and Addendum 5 to the Executive Order dated March 23, 2020, which required all businesses, and non-profit and government entities to implement telework procedures to the extent possible,
shall remain in full force and effect. Addendum 6 to the Executive Order dated March 24, 2020 (Stay Home/Stay Safe) shall remain in effect except as modified by Addendum 10, Addendum 11, Addendum 12, Addendum 13, Amendment,
this Addendum 14 and mitigation requirements and procedures for the limited, incremental and phased resumption of business, non-profit and government entity operations issued by the Secretary of ACCD with the approval of the
Governor. Businesses and non-profit and government entities which have not been authorized to resume operations as of the date of this Executive Order shall be addressed at a later date.

This Addendum 14 shall take effect upon signing and shall continue in full force and effect until midnight on June 15, 2020, at which time the Governor, in consultation with the Vermont Department of Health and the Department of Public Safety shall assess
the emergency and determine whether to amend or extend this Addendum.

Dated May 15, 2020

ADDENDUM 15 TO EXECUTIVE ORDER 01-20

[Outdoor Restaurants, Bars and Other Establishments that Offer Food and Drink]

WHEREAS, on Friday, March 13, 2020, the Governor issued Executive Order 01-20, Declaration of State of Emergency in Response to COVID-19 and National Guard Call-Out (“Executive Order”), declaring a state of emergency for the State of Vermont in response
to COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, the Governor, in consultation with Vermont Department of Health (“VDH”), and the Vermont Agency of Human Services, has initiated aggressive and sustained efforts to protect property and public health, and to ensure public safety in this public
health emergency including the issuance of Addendum 2 to the Executive Order issued March 17, 2020 ordering restaurants, bars, or establishments that offer food or drink to suspend on-premises consumption of food or drink;
and

WHEREAS, modeling studies done for the State clearly show that, but for the mitigation measures taken to date, the number of COVID-19 cases and COVID-19 related deaths in the State and the region would be having a much more devastating effect on Vermonters
and would be threatening to overwhelm the capacity of the Vermont health care system; and

WHEREAS, as of April 17, 2020, the Governor began to undertake a phased approach to reopen the economy, addressing the need to restore and strengthen the State’s overall social and economic wellbeing while including measures for the prevention of a resurgence
of COVID-19 that would undermine or lose the important public health outcomes achieved to date; and

WHEREAS, the Governor has determined, in consultation with the Commissioner of VDH, to consent to issuance by the Secretary of the Agency of Commerce and Community Development (ACCD), the limited, incremental, and phased resumption of restaurant and bar
operations, subject to further action as needed to respond to continued COVID-19 response; and

WHEREAS, the Governor has further determined to provide clarity regarding the suspension of fairs and festivals in 2020.

NOW THEREFORE, I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor of Vermont by the Constitution of the State of Vermont, the emergency powers set forth in 20 V.S.A. §§ 8, 9 and 11 and other laws hereby order as follows:

1.

Restaurant and Bar Operations.
Effective May 22, 2020, Addendum 2 to the Executive Order is hereby modified to allow the limited resumption of restaurant and bar operations in accordance with the general health and safety requirements and
the mitigation requirements and procedures regarding restaurant operations issued by the Secretary of ACCD.

If the Commissioner of VDH has determined that a COVID-19 outbreak has occurred and restaurant and bar operations cannot safely operate in a way that 1) limits the exposure of customers and staff to COVID-19 and 2) does not threaten to overwhelm our hospitals
and healthcare resources, he is hereby authorized, with approval of the Governor, to notify and require any or all restaurant or bar operations to return to certain standards of operation.

2.

State Regulation.
Effective May 22, 2020, the rules of the Board of the Department of Liquor and Lottery (Board) are hereby amended or rescinded, or shall be interpreted as necessary, to allow first, third and fourth class licensees
to offer outdoor consumption of beverage alcohol with, or independent of the sale of food, as follows:

DLL will waive all fees for an application for an initial or modified Outdoor Consumption Permit.

The Board shall not penalize any licensee who is in compliance with the terms of this Executive Order and any approved guidance issued hereunder.

Restaurants, bars, or other establishments that offers food or drink may continue to offer food and beverage alcohol for take-out and delivery.

• Licensees must submit a notice document to the Department of Liquor and Lottery (DLL), using an on-line form available at liquorcontrol.vermont.gov, to indicate intent to apply for an initial or modified Outdoor Consumption Permit. Upon submission of
the notice, licensees may begin to offer outdoor consumption of beverage alcohol with, or independent of the sale of food in accordance with ACCD guidance.

• Licensees must describe the area to be used for outdoor consumption of beverage alcohol and include in this description what physical barrier will define the perimeter of the area to be used.

• A licensee must have a legal control over, local authority to use or a legally binding agreement to use, the area it is applying to utilize.

• A licensee shall immediately submit its Outdoor Consumption Permit application to DLL for approval.

• DLL shall make best efforts to process all permit applications within 48 hours of submission.

• Applicants shall have until June 12, 2020 to obtain the approval of the local jurisdiction and may operate in accordance with the DLL permit pending that determination.

• Permits disapproved by a local jurisdiction shall be deemed disapproved by DLL.

3.

Local Ordinance and Regulation.
Enforcement of all municipal ordinances and regulations requiring an applicant to receive an approval or permit for outdoor food and beverage service is hereby suspended until such time as the local jurisdiction
has acted to disapprove an Outdoor Consumption Permit issued by DLL hereunder. All applications may be subject to review and approval by the local jurisdiction and reasonable conditions may be imposed, provided that nothing
in this Order shall require a municipality to approve an Outdoor Consumption Permit.

Failure of a local jurisdiction to impose conditions on, or disapprove, an Outdoor Consumption Permit on or before June 12, 2020 shall be deemed approval.

4.

Fairs and Festivals.
Vermonters planning fairs and festivals require certainty given the long lead time necessary for the successful operation of these fairs and festivals. For the sake of clarity, in light of the importance of
maintaining the public health outcomes achieved to date, and continuing to make more progress in suppressing, containing and eliminating the spread of the virus, how people gather, and in what quantity, will continue to change
in the months ahead. This will be problematic for large event planning purposes over the next 3-4 months and therefore traditional fairs and festivals are hereby cancelled until further notice.

This shall not prevent fairgrounds and other indoor and outdoor venues from operating for sporting, entertainment, concerts and other events in accordance with then applicable VDH/ACCD guidance on gathering size, occupancy limits, distancing and other
health and safety requirements.

This Addendum 15 shall take effect upon signing and shall continue in full force and effect until midnight on June 15, 2020, at which time the Governor, in consultation with the Vermont Department of Health and the Department of Public Safety shall assess
the emergency and determine whether to amend or extend this Addendum.

Dated May 22, 2020

ADDENDUM 16 TO EXECUTIVE ORDER 01-20

[Close Contact Businesses; Large Social Gatherings]

WHEREAS, on March 7, 2020 and March 11, 2020, the Vermont Department of Health (VDH) detected the first two cases of COVID-19 in Vermont and almost two months later Vermont has experienced almost 1,000 cases and over 50 related deaths; and

WHEREAS, on Friday, March 13, 2020, the Governor issued Executive Order 01-20, Declaration of State of Emergency in Response to COVID-19 and National Guard Call-Out (“Executive Order”), declaring a state of emergency for the State of Vermont in response
to COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, the Executive Order expressly recognized the critical need to minimize the risk to the public, maintain the health and safety of Vermonters, and limit the spread of infection in our communities and within our healthcare facilities and imposed
a limit on the size of mass gatherings; and

WHEREAS, consistent with Centers for Disease Control (CDC) guidelines regarding social distancing, and in consultation with the Commissioner of the Department of Health (VDH), the Governor has directed a number of mitigation strategies for the State in
order to protect individuals at risk for severe illness, including suspension of the operations of close contact businesses, additional limits on the size of gatherings and self-quarantine requirements for those travelling
to Vermont to stay; and

WHEREAS, modeling studies done for the State clearly show that, but for the mitigation measures taken to date, the number of COVID-19 cases and COVID-19 related deaths in the State and the region would be having a much more devastating effect on Vermonters
and would be threatening to overwhelm the capacity of the Vermont health care system; and

WHEREAS, the Governor has undertaken a cautious, incremental and evidence-based approach to restarting Vermont’s economy and continues to do so with the limited reopening of close contact businesses and incremental increases to the size of gatherings.

NOW THEREFORE, I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor of Vermont by the Constitution of the State of Vermont, the emergency powers set forth in 20 V.S.A. §§ 8, 9 and 11 and other laws, hereby supplement Addendum 4 to the
Executive Order to direct the Secretary of the Agency of Commerce and Community Development (ACCD) to issue mitigation requirements and procedures for the limited, incremental and phased resumption of close contact businesses
such as gymnasiums, fitness centers and similar exercise facilities, nail salons, spas and tattoo parlors business, effective June 1, 2020. The limited, incremental, and phased resumption of close contact businesses shall require
implementation of appropriate occupancy limits and physical distancing, health and sanitation and training measures.

IT IS FURTHER ORDERED:

1.

Large Gatherings.
As of June 1, 2020, Section 6 of the Executive Order and Addendum 4 to the Executive Order are amended to allow social gatherings of up to twenty-five (25) people at the same time in any confined indoor or outdoor
space which encourages congregation;

provided however,
to the extent the Secretary of ACCD has established occupancy limits for business and non-profit and government entity operations, including, but not limited to, retail, recreational, dining, worship and event
spaces in order to ensure appropriate physical distancing, applicable occupancy limits shall apply. Absent an established occupancy limit, the limit on social gatherings as set forth herein and modified by the Secretary of
ACCD, shall apply.

Questions from commercial entities, employers, event sponsors and others shall be directed to ACCD which shall provide appropriate guidance.

2.

Authority of the Secretary.
The Secretary of ACCD, in consultation with the Commissioner of VDH, and with the approval of the Governor, may, from time-to-time, authorize the additional limited, incremental, and phased resumption of close
contact businesses, and update and modify the mitigation requirements and procedures regarding the resumption of close contact businesses.

If the Commissioner of the VDH has determined that a COVID-19 outbreak has occurred and close contact businesses cannot safely operate in a way that 1) limits the exposure of customers and staff to COVID-19; and 2) does not threaten to overwhelm our hospitals
and healthcare resources, he is hereby authorized, with approval of the Governor, to notify and require any or all businesses and non-profit and government entities to return to certain standards of operation.

Further, the Secretary of ACCD, in consultation with the Commissioner of VDH, and with the approval of the Governor, may, from time-to-time, authorize additional limited and incremental increases to gathering size.

If the Commissioner of the VDH has determined that a COVID-19 outbreak has occurred and Vermonters cannot safely congregate in gatherings due to increased risk of exposure to COVID-19, he is hereby authorized, with approval of the Governor, to decrease
the size of gatherings as necessary to minimize the risk to the public, maintain the health and safety of Vermonters, and limit the spread of infection in our communities and within our healthcare facilities.

This Addendum 16 to the Executive Order shall take effect upon signing and shall continue in full force and effect until June 15, 2020, at which time the Governor, in consultation with the Vermont Department of Health and Agency of Human Services, the
Department of Public Safety/Division of Emergency Management shall assess the emergency and determine whether to amend or extend this Order.

Dated May 29, 2020

ADDENDUM 17 TO EXECUTIVE ORDER 01-20

[Modified Quarantine Restrictions on Travelers Arriving in Vermont; Municipal Regulation of Bars and Restaurants]

WHEREAS, on March 7, 2020 and March 11, 2020, the Vermont Department of Health (VDH) detected the first two cases of COVID-19 in Vermont and almost two months later Vermont has experienced over 1,000 cases and 55 related deaths; and

WHEREAS, on Friday, March 13, 2020, the Governor issued Executive Order 01-20, Declaration of State of Emergency in Response to COVID-19 and National Guard Call-Out (“Executive Order”), declaring a state of emergency for the State of Vermont in response
to COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, the Executive Order expressly recognized the critical need to minimize the risk to the public, maintain the health and safety of Vermonters, and limit the spread of infection in our communities and within our healthcare facilities; and

WHEREAS, consistent with Centers for Disease Control (CDC) guidelines regarding social distancing, and in consultation with the Commissioner of VDH, the Governor has directed a number of mitigation strategies for the State in order to protect individuals
at risk for severe illness, including self-quarantine requirements for residents and non-residents travelling to Vermont to stay; and

WHEREAS, modeling studies done for the State clearly show that, but for the mitigation measures taken to date, the number of COVID-19 cases and COVID-19 related deaths in the State and the region would be having a much more devastating effect on Vermonters
and would be threatening to overwhelm the capacity of the Vermont health care system; and

WHEREAS, the Governor has undertaken a cautious, incremental and evidence-based approach to restarting Vermont’s economy and continues to do so with the modification of the State’s quarantine requirements to facilitate travel into Vermont without home-quarantine
for a period of fourteen (14) days, based on data regarding rates of COVID-19 infection; and

WHEREAS, the impact of COVID-19 on the Northeast United States has been significant with approximately 41 percent of all confirmed U.S. cases located within a 5-hour drive of the Vermont border, however, analysis by the State has found many counties in
New York and New England currently have a low active case count making the risk of COVID-19 transmission for those traveling from those counties to Vermont low.

NOW THEREFORE, I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor of Vermont by the Constitution of the State of Vermont, the emergency powers set forth in 20 V.S.A. §§ 8, 9 and 11 and other laws, hereby order the following:

1.

Amendment to Addendum 7 to the Executive Order.
Effective Monday, June 8. 2020, Addendum 7 to the Executive Order is hereby further amended to allow travel without quarantine restrictions to and from the counties of Maine, New Hampshire, Massachusetts, Rhode
Island, Connecticut and New York with 400 or fewer active cases of COVID-19 per million, and as further set forth in guidance issued by the Secretary of the Agency of Commerce and Community Development (ACCD).

2.
The Commissioner of the Department of Financial Regulation (DFR) shall report to the Governor on a weekly basis on the regional data regarding rates of COVID-19 infection, by county, for New York and each New England
state. The list of qualifying counties shall be updated weekly and posted to the website of ACCD.

3.
The Secretary of ACCD, in consultation with the Commissioner of DFR and the Commissioner of VDH, with the approval of the Governor, may, from time-to-time, determine quarantine requirements designed with reference
to state and regional COVID-19 infection rates to be the least restrictive means necessary to preserve the public health and safety, ensure the healthcare delivery system is capable of serving all, and help protect those at
the highest risk and vulnerability.

4.
The Agency of Transportation and the Department of Motor Vehicles are hereby directed to post this guidance at all major points of entry into Vermont, on highway message boards and at the Burlington International
Airport and all other Vermont airports.

5.
Guidance for self-quarantine shall be made available by ACCD and VDH.

6.
Vermonters planning to travel out of state should understand that each state may have its own quarantine policy unique to the needs of that jurisdiction to address the COVID-19 crisis. Vermonters are expected to
be familiar with and respect the quarantine policies of these states when travelling.

7.
Restaurant, Bar and Catering Operations; State Regulation. For the sake of clarity, Addendum 14 to the Executive Order is intended to authorize the Secretary of ACCD, in consultation with the Commissioner of VDH,
and with the approval of the Governor, to, from time-to-time, implement the additional limited, incremental, and phased resumption of indoor and outdoor restaurant, bar and catering businesses, and update and modify the mitigation
requirements and procedures regarding the resumption of those businesses.

Further, for the sake of clarity, the Board of the Department of Liquor and Lottery (Board) is hereby directed to amend, rescind, or interpret its rules, procedures and permitting requirements as necessary, to allow first, third and fourth class licensees,
licensed caterers and licensed manufacturers to resume operations in accordance with ACCD guidance for both outdoor and indoor restaurant and bar operations and catering events.

8.
Municipal Ordinances and Regulations for the Restart of Bars. The legislative body of each municipality may enact local requirements which are more strict than the guidance issued by ACCD regarding the operation
of bars, catering facilities and restaurants, to address an outbreak of COVID-19 in the municipality.

Except as otherwise set forth herein, Addendum 7 to the Executive Order as amended in Addendum 14 to the Executive Order and as amended herein, and this Addendum to the Executive Order shall take effect upon signing and shall continue in full force and
effect until June 15, 2020, at which time the Governor, in consultation with the Vermont Department of Health, the Agency of Human Services and the Department of Public Safety/Division of Emergency Management shall assess the
emergency and determine whether to amend or extend this Order.

Dated June 5, 2020.

AMENDED AND RESTATED EXECUTIVE ORDER NO. 01-20

[Declaration of State of Emergency in Response to COVID-19 and National Guard Call-Out]

WHEREAS, since December 2019, Vermont has been working in close collaboration with the national Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) and with the United States Health and Human Services Agency to monitor and plan for the potential for an outbreak
of respiratory illness due to a novel coronavirus (a disease now known as COVID-19), in the United States; and

WHEREAS, this rapidly evolving global situation required the Governor to direct the Vermont Department of Health (VDH) to activate the Health Operations Center (HOC) in February 2020 when VDH began to monitor and later, test Vermonters who may have been
exposed to COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, in March 2020, the Governor directed Vermont Emergency Management (VEM) to assemble an interagency taskforce, and later to activate the Vermont State Emergency Operations Center (SEOC), in accordance with the State Emergency Management Plan,
to organize prevention, response, and mitigation efforts and share information with local and state officials; and

WHEREAS, on March 7, 2020 and March 11, 2020, VDH detected the first two cases of COVID-19 in Vermont; and

WHEREAS, on March 11, 2020 the World Health Organization made the assessment that COVID-19 can be characterized as a pandemic; and

WHEREAS, we learned that while most individuals affected by COVID-19 will experience mild flu-like symptoms, some individuals, especially those who are elderly or already have severe underlying chronic health conditions will have more serious symptoms
and require hospitalization; and

WHEREAS, on Friday, March 13, 2020, the Governor issued Executive Order 01-20, Declaration of State of Emergency in Response to COVID-19 and National Guard Call-Out (“Executive Order”), declaring a state of emergency for the State of Vermont in response
to COVID-19 (extended April 10 and May 15, 2020); and

WHEREAS, at the federal level, three separate emergency declarations were declared and remain in effect: a Health and Human Services (HHS) Public Health Emergency (January 31, 2020 renewed April 21, 2020), a Stafford Act Emergency (March 13, 2020), and
a National Emergency (March 13, 2020); and

WHEREAS, all states in the region, including Vermont, have experienced community transmission of COVID-19 which has led to hundreds of thousands of cases and thousands of deaths, with at least one-third of all cases nationally found within a five hour
drive of Vermont’s borders; and

WHEREAS, the Governor, in consultation with VDH, has initiated aggressive and sustained efforts to protect property and public health, and to ensure public safety in this health emergency including issuing an Executive Order, as supplemented and amended
and Directives issued pursuant to the Executive Order to limit in-person contact, such as limiting the size of gatherings, closure of schools and the institution of remote learning through the end of the 2019-2020 school year,
directing the postponement of non-essential medical and surgical procedures, suspending the operation of close contact businesses, requiring telecommuting and work from home, requiring Vermonters to stay home and stay safe
with exceptions for essential purposes and suspending the operation of businesses which were not deemed critical to public health and safety and national and economic security; and

WHEREAS, modeling studies done for the State clearly show that, but for the mitigation measures taken to date, the number of COVID-19 cases and COVID-19 related deaths in the State and the region would be having a much more devastating effect on Vermonters
and would have threatened to overwhelm the capacity of the Vermont health care system; and

WHEREAS, the Governor has undertaken a cautious, measured and data-based approach to restarting Vermont’s economy to minimize the risk to the public by limiting the spread of infection in our communities in order to protect the most vulnerable, while
reopening our business, non-profit, government and recreation sectors in a safe and effective way; and

WHEREAS, numerous tools needed to address response efforts remain in place by virtue of the State of Emergency declaration, including protections for residents of long term and other medical care facilities, licensing and regulatory flexibility needed
to facilitate the medical response, health and safety requirements, expanded housing and meal delivery systems, expanded eligibility for unemployment insurance, tools needed by certain businesses to maintain a minimum level
of economic sustainability, and federal emergency funding; and

WHEREAS, the General Assembly has passed no fewer than seven COVID-19-related measures dependent on the existence of a declared State of Emergency, including three delivered to the Governor as recently as June 9, 2020, that support health care providers,